Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202054-2941
Veterinary inspector or agent of the USDA/APHIS/VS; act as agent of the department, when.

Any veterinary inspector or agent of the USDA/APHIS/VS who has been officially assigned by the United States Department of Agriculture for service in Nebraska may be officially authorized by the department to perform and exercise such powers and duties as may be prescribed by the department, and when so authorized shall have and exercise all rights and powers under the Animal Health and Disease Control Act and the Exotic Animal Auction or Exchange Venue Act as agents of the department.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 41.

Exotic Animal Auction or Exchange Venue Act, see section 54-7,105.